Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 17 Livestock Remedies

Cross references. —

For definition of the term “director,” see §

11-1-101

.

As to commercial feed, see ch. 13 of this title.

Severability. —

Section 9, ch. 70, Laws 1929, reads: “If any provisions of this act shall be held invalid, it is hereby provided that all other portions of this act which are not expressly held to be invalid shall continue in full force and effect.”

Repealing clauses. —

Section 10, ch. 70, Laws 1929, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict with that act.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

3 Am. Jur. 2d Agriculture §§ 38 to 48.

3A C.J.S. Animals §§ 66 to 68.